Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-134] Misbehavior before the enemy.
Any person subject to this chapter who before or in the presence of the enemy:

(1) Runs away;

(2) Shamefully abandons, surrenders, or delivers up
any command, unit, place, or military property which it is the person's duty to
defend;

(3) Through disobedience, neglect, or intentional
misconduct endangers the safety of any such command, unit, place, or military
property;

(4) Casts away the person's arms or ammunition;

(5) Is guilty of cowardly conduct;

(6) Quits the person's place of duty to plunder or
pillage;

(7) Causes false alarms in any command, unit, or
place under control of the armed forces of the United States or the state
military forces;

(8) Wilfully fails to do the person's utmost to
encounter, engage, capture, or destroy any enemy troops, combatants, vessels,
aircraft, or any other thing, which it is the person's duty so to encounter,
engage, capture, or destroy; or

(9) Does not afford all practicable relief and
assistance to any troops, combatants, vessels, or aircraft of the armed forces
belonging to the United States or their allies, to the State, or to any other
state, when engaged in battle;

shall be punished as a court-martial may direct. [L
1982, c 171, pt of §2; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next